Utah statutes.
31A-23a-701.   Applicability.

(1)  This part applies to licensed insurers, as defined in Section 31A-23a-102, that are domiciled:

(a)  in this state; or

(b)  in a state that does not have a substantially similar law.

(2)  All provisions of Chapter 16, Insurance Holding Companies, to the extent they are not superseded by this part, continue to apply to all parties within holding company systems subject to this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

